Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Chapter 9. Civil Commitment of Sexually Violent Predators.
§ 37.2-906.
Probable cause hearing; procedures.

Upon the filing of a petition alleging that the respondent is a sexually violent predator, the circuit court shall (i) forthwith order that until a final order is entered in the proceeding, in the case of a prisoner, he remain in the secure custody of the Department of Corrections or, in the case of a defendant, he remain in the secure custody of the Department and (ii) schedule a hearing within 90 days to determine whether probable cause exists to believe that the respondent is a sexually violent predator. The respondent may waive his right to a hearing under this section. A continuance extending the case beyond the 90 days may be granted to either the Attorney General or the respondent upon good cause shown or by agreement of the parties. The clerk shall mail a copy of the petition to the attorney appointed or retained for the respondent and to the person in charge of the facility in which the respondent is then confined. The person in charge of the facility shall cause the petition to be delivered to the respondent and shall certify the delivery to the clerk. In addition, a written explanation of the sexually violent predator involuntary commitment process and the statutory protections associated with the process shall be given to the respondent at the time the petition is delivered.

Any hearing or proceeding under this section may be conducted using a two-way electronic video and audio communication system to provide for the appearance of any parties and witnesses. Any two-way electronic video and audio communication system shall meet the standards set forth in subsection B of §

19.2-3.1

.

Prior to any hearing under this section, the judge shall ascertain if the respondent is represented by counsel and, if he is not represented by counsel, the judge shall appoint an attorney to represent him. However, if the respondent requests an opportunity to employ counsel, the court shall give him a reasonable opportunity to employ counsel at his own expense.

A respondent who has refused to cooperate with a mental health examination required pursuant to §

37.2-904

may, within 21 days of the retention of counsel or appointment of counsel, rescind his refusal and elect to cooperate with the mental health examination. Counsel for the respondent shall provide written notice of the respondent’s election to cooperate with the mental health examination to the court and the attorney for the Commonwealth within 30 days of the retention or appointment of counsel, and the probable cause hearing shall be stayed until 30 days after receipt of the mental health examiner’s report. The mental health examination shall be conducted in accordance with subsection B of §

37.2-904

. Results of the evaluation shall be filed with the court and copies of the results shall be provided to counsel for the parties. The mental health examiner’s itemized account of expenses, duly sworn to, shall be presented to the court and, when allowed, shall be certified to the Supreme Court for payment out of the state treasury and shall be charged against the appropriations made to pay criminal charges.In the event that a respondent refuses to cooperate with the mental health examination required by §

37.2-904

or fails or refuses to cooperate with the mental health examination following rescission of his refusal pursuant to this subsection, the court shall admit evidence of such failure or refusal and shall bar the respondent from introducing his own expert psychiatric and psychological evidence.

At the probable cause hearing, the judge shall (i) verify the respondent’s identity and (ii) determine whether probable cause exists to believe that he is a sexually violent predator. The existence of any prior convictions or charges may be shown with affidavits or documentary evidence. The details underlying the commission of an offense or behavior that led to a prior conviction or charge may be shown by affidavits or documentary evidence, including but not limited to, hearing and/or trial transcripts, probation and parole and sentencing reports, police and sheriffs’ reports, and mental health evaluations. If he meets the qualifications set forth in subsection B of §

37.2-904

, the expert witness may be permitted to testify at the probable cause hearing as to his diagnosis, his opinion as to whether the respondent meets the definition of a sexually violent predator, his recommendations as to treatment, and the basis for his opinions. Such opinions shall not be dispositive of whether the respondent is a sexually violent predator.

In the case of a prisoner in the custody of the Department of Corrections, if the judge finds that there is not probable cause to believe that the respondent is a sexually violent predator, the judge shall dismiss the petition, and the respondent shall remain in the custody of the Department of Corrections until his scheduled date of release from prison. In the case of a defendant, if the judge finds that there is not probable cause to believe the respondent is a sexually violent predator, the judge shall dismiss the petition and order that the respondent be discharged, involuntarily admitted pursuant to §§

37.2-814

through

37.2-819

, or certified for admission pursuant to §

37.2-806

.

History.

1999, cc. 946, 985, § 37.1-70.7; 2001, c. 776; 2004, c. 764; 2005, c. 716; 2006, cc. 863, 914; 2007, c. 876; 2009, c. 740; 2011, cc. 446, 448; 2012, cc. 121, 246.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 863 and 914 are identical, and inserted the second sentence in subsection A.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 876 rewrote this section.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 740, in subsection A, substituted “90 days” for “60 days” twice and inserted the present second sentence.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 446 and 448 are identical, and added subsection C and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 121 and 246 are identical, and added subsection B; and redesignated former subsections B through E as subsections C through F.

§ 37.2-907.
Right to assistance of experts; compensation.

Upon a finding of probable cause the judge shall ascertain if the respondent is requesting expert assistance. If the respondent requests expert assistance and has not employed an expert at his own expense, the judge shall appoint such experts as he deems necessary. However, if the respondent refused to cooperate with the mental health examination required pursuant to §

37.2-904

or failed or refused to cooperate with a mental health examination following rescission of a refusal pursuant to §

37.2-906

, any expert appointed to assist the respondent shall not be permitted to testify at trial nor shall any report of any such expert be admissible. Any expert employed or appointed pursuant to this section shall be a licensed psychiatrist or licensed clinical psychologist who is skilled in the diagnosis and risk assessment of sex offenders and knowledgeable about the treatment of sex offenders, and who is not a member of the CRC. Any expert employed or appointed pursuant to this section shall have reasonable access to all relevant medical and psychological records and reports pertaining to the respondent. No such expert shall be permitted to testify as a witness on behalf of the respondent unless that expert has prepared a written report detailing his findings and conclusions and has submitted his report, along with all supporting data, to the court, the Attorney General, and counsel for the respondent. Such report shall be submitted no less than 45 days prior to the trial of the matter unless a different time period is agreed to by the parties.

Each psychiatrist, psychologist, or other expert appointed by the court to render professional service pursuant to this chapter who is not regularly employed by the Commonwealth, except by the University of Virginia School of Medicine and the Virginia Commonwealth University School of Medicine, shall receive a reasonable fee for such service. The fee shall be determined in each instance by the court that appointed the expert, in accordance with guidelines established by the Supreme Court after consultation with the Department. The fee shall not exceed $5,000. However, in addition, if any such expert is required to appear as a witness in any hearing held pursuant to this chapter, he shall receive mileage and a fee of $750 for each day during which he is required to serve. An itemized account of expenses, duly sworn to, shall be presented to the court, and, when allowed, shall be certified to the Supreme Court for payment out of the state treasury, and shall be charged against the appropriations made to pay criminal charges. Allowance for the fee and for the per diem authorized shall also be made by order of the court, duly certified to the Supreme Court, for payment out of the appropriation to pay criminal charges.

History.

1999, cc. 946, 985, § 37.1-70.8; 2001, c. 776; 2004, c. 764; 2005, c. 716; 2006, cc. 863, 914; 2007, c. 876; 2009, c. 740; 2011, cc. 42, 446, 448.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 863 and 914 are identical, and deleted “violent” preceding “sex offenders” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection A.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 876 rewrote subsection A; and substituted “shall” for “must” in subsection B.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 740, in subsection A, inserted “nor shall any report of any such expert be admissible” and added the last two sentences.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 42, in the fourth sentence in subsection A, deleted “treatment” following “diagnosis” and inserted “and knowledgeable about the treatment of sex offenders.”

The 2011 amendments by cc. 446 and 448 are identical, and, in subsection A, subdivided the former second sentence into the second and third sentences by substituting “However” for “however” and “with the mental health examination required pursuant to §

37.2-904

or failed to cooperate with a mental health examination following rescission of a refusal pursuant to §

37.2-906

” for “pursuant to §

37.2-901

.”

§ 37.2-908.
Trial; right to trial by jury; standard of proof; discovery.

Within 120 days after the completion of the probable cause hearing held pursuant to §

37.2-906

, the court shall conduct a trial to determine whether the respondent is a sexually violent predator. A continuance extending the case beyond the 120 days may be granted to either the Attorney General or the respondent upon good cause shown or by agreement of the parties.

The Attorney General or the respondent shall have the right to a trial by jury. Seven persons from a panel of 13 shall constitute a jury in such cases. If a jury determines that the respondent is a sexually violent predator, a unanimous verdict shall be required. If no demand is made by either party for a trial by jury, the trial shall be before the court.

The court or jury shall determine whether, by clear and convincing evidence, the respondent is a sexually violent predator. If the court or jury does not find clear and convincing evidence that the respondent is a sexually violent predator, the court shall, in the case of a prisoner, direct that he be returned to the custody of the Department of Corrections. The Department of Corrections shall immediately release him if his scheduled release date has passed, or hold him until his scheduled release date. In the case of a defendant, if the court or jury does not find by clear and convincing evidence that he is a sexually violent predator, the court shall order that he be discharged, involuntarily admitted pursuant to §§

37.2-814

through

37.2-819

, or certified for admission pursuant to §

37.2-806

.If he meets the qualifications set forth in subsection B of §

37.2-904

or

37.2-907

, any expert witness may be permitted to testify at the trial as to his diagnosis, his opinion as to whether the respondent meets the definition of a sexually violent predator, his recommendation as to treatment, and the basis for his opinions. Such opinions shall not be dispositive of whether the respondent is a sexually violent predator.

If the court or jury finds the respondent to be a sexually violent predator, the court shall then determine that the respondent shall be committed or continue the trial for not less than 45 days nor more than 60 days pursuant to subsection E. A continuance extending the case beyond the 60 days may be granted to either the Attorney General or the respondent upon good cause shown or by agreement of the parties. In making its determination, the court may consider (i) the nature and circumstances of the sexually violent offense for which the respondent was charged or convicted, including the age and maturity of the victim; (ii) the results of any actuarial test, including the likelihood of recidivism; (iii) the results of any diagnostic tests previously administered to the respondent under this chapter; (iv) the respondent’s mental history, including treatments for mental illness or mental disorders, participation in and response to therapy or treatment, and any history of previous hospitalizations; (v) the respondent’s present mental condition; (vi) the respondent’s disciplinary record and types of infractions he may have committed while incarcerated or hospitalized; (vii) the respondent’s living arrangements and potential employment if he were to be placed on conditional release; (viii) the availability of transportation and appropriate supervision to ensure participation by the respondent in necessary treatment; and (ix) any other factors that the court deems relevant. If after considering the factors listed in §

37.2-912

, the court finds that there is no suitable less restrictive alternative to involuntary secure inpatient treatment, the judge shall by written order and specific findings so certify and order that the respondent be committed to the custody of the Department for appropriate inpatient treatment in a secure facility designated by the Commissioner. Respondents committed pursuant to this chapter are subject to the provisions of §

19.2-174.1

and Chapter 11 (§

37.2-1100

et seq.).

If the court determines to continue the trial to receive additional evidence on possible alternatives to commitment, the court shall require the Commissioner to submit a report to the court, the Attorney General, and counsel for the respondent suggesting possible alternatives to commitment. The court shall then reconvene the trial and receive testimony on the possible alternatives to commitment. At the conclusion of testimony on the possible alternatives to commitment, the court shall consider: (i) the treatment needs of the respondent; (ii) whether less restrictive alternatives to commitment have been investigated and deemed suitable; (iii) whether any such alternatives will accommodate needed and appropriate supervision and treatment plans for the respondent, including but not limited to, therapy or counseling, access to medications, availability of travel, and location of proposed residence; and (iv) whether any such alternatives will accommodate needed and appropriate regular psychological or physiological testing, including but not limited to, penile plethysmograph testing or sexual interest testing. If the court finds these criteria are adequately addressed and the court finds that the respondent meets the criteria for conditional release set forth in §

37.2-912

, the court shall order that the respondent be returned to the custody of the Department of Corrections to be processed for conditional release as a sexually violent predator pursuant to his conditional release plan. The court shall also order the respondent to be subject to electronic monitoring of his location by means of a GPS (Global Positioning System) tracking device, or other similar device, at all times while he is on conditional release. Access to anti-androgen medications or other medication prescribed to lower blood serum testosterone shall not be used as a primary reason for determining that less restrictive alternatives are appropriate pursuant to this chapter.

The Department shall recommend a specific course of treatment and programs for provision of such treatment and shall monitor the respondent’s compliance with such treatment as may be ordered by the court under this section, unless the respondent is on parole or probation, in which case the parole or probation officer shall monitor his compliance.

In the event of a mistrial, the court shall direct that the prisoner remain in the secure custody of the Department of Corrections or the defendant remain in the secure custody of the Department until another trial is conducted. Any subsequent trial following a mistrial shall be held within 90 days of the previous trial.

History.

1999, cc. 946, 985, § 37.1-70.9; 2001, c. 776; 2003, cc. 989, 1018; 2004, c. 764; 2005, cc. 716, 914; 2006, cc. 863, 914; 2007, c. 876; 2009, c. 740.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 914, amended former § 37.1-70.9. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the amendments by c. 914 have been given effect in the section as set out above. The 2005 amendment by c. 914, in subsection C, deleted “until his scheduled date of release, or that the prisoner be unconditionally released if his scheduled date of release has passed” at the end of the second sentence and added the third sentence in the first paragraph; in the second paragraph, substituted “whether the person shall be fully committed or placed on conditional release” for “the nature of treatment the person is to receive” at the end of the first sentence, and; in the last paragraph, deleted “redacted” following “clerk” in the fifth sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 863 and 914 are nearly identical, and added the last sentence in subsection A; inserted subsection designators D through H and added the second sentence in subsection D; in subsection E, inserted “nor more than 60 days” in the first sentence, inserted the language “and that any such alternatives . . . if necessary” in the thrid sentence and inserted the fourth sentence and made related changes, and added the last sentence; and substituted “possess and copy the victim impact statement or presentence or postsentence report for use at the trial. Within 30 days after the case is finally disposed of, counsel for the prisoner or defendant and any expert employed or appointed pursuant to §

37.2-907

shall return all copies of the victim impact statements and presentence and postsentence reports to the Attorney General. However, in no event shall the prisoner or defendant be permitted to possess or copy a victim impact statement or presentence or postsentence report” for “review the victim impact statement or presentence investigation report outside the presence of the prisoner or defendant. The Attorney General shall file with the clerk copies of any relevant presentence reports, postsentence reports, and victim impact statements in his possession, withholding identifying information about victims. Such filings shall be held by the court in confidence and reviewable only by the court, the Attorney General, and the counsel for the prisoner or defendant pursuant to this section” at the end of subsection H.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 876 rewrote this section.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 740, in subsection A, substituted “120 days” for “90 days” twice; in subsection D, deleted “fully” preceding “committed or continue,” substituted “45 days” for “30 days” and added the present second sentence; rewrote subsection E; in subsection F, deleted the last two sentences, which read: “The respondent’s failure to comply with involuntary outpatient treatment as ordered by the court may be admitted into evidence in subsequent hearings held pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. Upon failure of the respondent to adhere to the terms of the involuntary outpatient treatment, the judge may revoke the same and, upon notice to the respondent undergoing involuntary outpatient treatment and after a hearing, order the respondent committed as a sexually violent predator for inpatient treatment at a secure facility designated by the Commissioner”; and deleted subsection H.

Law Review.

For article summarizing published Virginia criminal law decisions between July 1, 2002 and July 1, 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 87 (2003).

§ 37.2-909.
Placement of committed respondents.

Any respondent committed pursuant to this chapter shall be placed in the custody of the Department for control, care, and treatment until such time as the respondent’s mental abnormality or personality disorder has so changed that the respondent will not present an undue risk to public safety. The Department shall provide such control, care, and treatment at a secure facility operated by it or may contract with private or public entities, in or outside of the Commonwealth, or with other states to provide comparable control, care, or treatment. At all times, respondents committed for control, care, and treatment by the Department pursuant to this chapter shall be kept in a secure facility. Respondents committed under this chapter shall be segregated by sight and sound at all times from prisoners in the custody of a correctional facility. The Commissioner may make treatment and management decisions regarding committed respondents in his custody without obtaining prior approval of or review by the committing court.

Prior to the siting of a new facility or the designation of an existing facility to be operated by the Department for the control, care, and treatment of committed respondents, the Commissioner shall notify the state elected officials for and the local governing body of the jurisdiction of the proposed location, designation, or expansion of the facility. Upon receiving such notice, the local governing body of the jurisdiction of the proposed site or where the existing facility is located may publish a descriptive notice concerning the proposed site or existing facility in a newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction.The Commissioner also shall establish an advisory committee relating to any facility for which notice is required by this subsection or any facility being operated for the purpose of the control, care, and treatment of committed respondents. The advisory committee shall consist of state and local elected officials and representatives of community organizations serving the jurisdiction in which the facility is proposed to be or is located. Upon request, the members of the appropriate advisory committee shall be notified whenever the Department increases the number of beds in the relevant facility.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when any respondent is committed under this article, the Department of Corrections and the Office of the Attorney General shall provide to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, a copy of all relevant criminal history information, medical and mental health records, presentence or postsentence reports and victim impact statements, and the mental health evaluations performed pursuant to subsection B of §

37.2-904

and §

37.2-907

, for use in the treatment and evaluation of the committed respondent.

History.

1999, cc. 946, 985, § 37.1-70.10; 2001, c. 776; 2003, cc. 989, 1018; 2004, c. 707; 2005, cc. 716, 914; 2009, cc. 740, 813, 840.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 914, amended former § 37.1-70.10, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 amendment by c. 914 has been given effect in this section by adding subsection C.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 740, in subsection A, substituted “respondent” for “person,” “respondent’s” for “person’s,” and “respondents” for “persons” throughout; in subsection B, substituted “committed respondents” for “persons convicted of a sexually violent offense who have been referred for civil commitment” twice; and in subsection C, substituted “respondent” for “person.”

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” in subsection C.

§ 37.2-910.
Review of continuation of secure inpatient treatment hearing; procedure and reports; disposition.

The committing court shall conduct a hearing 12 months after the date of commitment to assess each respondent’s need for secure inpatient treatment. A hearing for assessment shall be conducted at yearly intervals for five years and at biennial intervals thereafter. The court shall schedule the matter for hearing as soon as possible after it becomes due, giving the matter priority over all pending matters before the court. A continuance extending the review may be granted to either the Attorney General or the respondent upon good cause shown or by agreement of the parties. Whenever practicable, the hearing for assessment shall be conducted using a two-way electronic video and audio communication system that meets the standards set forth in subsection B of §

19.2-3.1

.

Prior to the hearing, the Commissioner shall provide to the court a report reevaluating the respondent’s condition and recommending treatment. The report shall be prepared by a licensed psychiatrist or a licensed clinical psychologist skilled in the diagnosis and risk assessment of sex offenders and knowledgeable about the treatment of sex offenders. If the Commissioner’s report recommends discharge or the respondent requests discharge, the respondent’s condition and need for secure inpatient treatment shall be evaluated by a second person with such credentials who is not currently treating the respondent. Any professional person who conducts a second evaluation of a respondent shall submit a report of his findings to the court and the Commissioner. A copy of any report submitted pursuant to this subsection shall be sent to the Attorney General and to any attorney appointed or retained for the respondent.

The burden of proof at the hearing shall be upon the Commonwealth to prove to the court by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent remains a sexually violent predator.

If the court finds, based upon the report and other evidence provided at the hearing, that the respondent is no longer a sexually violent predator, the court shall release the respondent from secure inpatient treatment. If the court finds that the respondent remains a sexually violent predator, it shall order that he remain in the custody of the Commissioner for secure inpatient hospitalization and treatment or that he be conditionally released. To determine if the respondent shall be conditionally released, the court shall determine if the respondent meets the criteria for conditional release set forth in §

37.2-912

. If the court orders that the respondent be conditionally released, the court shall allow the Department no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days to prepare a conditional release plan. Any such plan must be able to accommodate needed and appropriate supervision and treatment plans for the respondent, including but not limited to, therapy or counseling, access to medications, availability of travel, location of residence, and regular psychological monitoring of the respondent if called for, including polygraph examinations, penile plethysmograph testing, or sexual interest testing, if necessary. Access to anti-androgen medications or other medication prescribed to lower blood serum testosterone shall not be used as a primary reason for determining that less restrictive alternatives are appropriate pursuant to this chapter. In preparing the conditional release plan, the Department shall notify the attorney for the Commonwealth, the chief law-enforcement officer, and the governing body for the locality that is the proposed location of the respondent’s residence upon his conditional release.If the court places the respondent on conditional release, the court shall order the respondent to be subject to electronic monitoring of his location by means of a GPS (Global Positioning System) tracking device, or other similar device, at all times while he is on conditional release.

History.

1999, cc. 946, 985, § 37.1-70.11; 2001, c. 776; 2003, cc. 989, 1018; 2005, c. 716; 2006, cc. 698, 730, 863, 914; 2007, c. 876; 2011, cc. 42, 446, 448; 2013, c. 258; 2015, c. 662.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 698 and 730, effective April 5, 2006, are identical, and added the last paragraph in subsection D.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 863 and 914, are identical, and deleted “violent” preceding “sex offenders” in the first sentence in subsection B; and rewrote subsection D.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 876 substituted “respondent” for “committed person” and made similar and related changes throughout; added the last sentence to subsection A; and substituted “diagnosis, treatment and risk assessment of sex offenders” for “diagnosis and treatment of mental abnormalities and personality disorders associated with sex offenders and qualified by training and experience to perform forensic evaluations” in subsection B.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 42, in the second sentence in subsection B, deleted “treatment” following “diagnosis” and inserted “and knowledgeable about the treatment of sex offenders.”

The 2011 amendments by cc. 446 and 448 are identical, and added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 258 added “and to any attorney appointed or retained for the respondent” at the end of subsection B.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 662 added the seventh sentence of subsection D.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 269 (2009).

§ 37.2-911.
Petition for release; hearing; procedures.

The Commissioner may petition the committing court for conditional release of the committed respondent at any time he believes the committed respondent’s condition has so changed that he is no longer in need of secure inpatient treatment. The Commissioner may petition the committing court for unconditional release of the committed respondent at any time he believes the committed respondent’s condition has so changed that he is no longer a sexually violent predator. The petition shall be accompanied by a report of clinical findings supporting the petition and by a conditional release or discharge plan, as applicable, prepared by the Department. The committed respondent may petition the committing court for release only once in each year in which no annual judicial review is required pursuant to §

37.2-910

. The party petitioning for release shall transmit a copy of the petition to the Attorney General, the Commissioner, and the attorney for the Commonwealth for the locality that is the proposed location of the respondent’s residence upon his conditional release.

Upon the submission of a petition pursuant to this section, the committing court shall conduct the proceedings according to the procedures set forth in §

37.2-910

.

History.

1999, cc. 946, 985, § 37.1-70.12; 2001, c. 776; 2003, cc. 989, 1018; 2005, c. 716; 2009, c. 740; 2015, c. 662.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 740, in subsection A, substituted “respondent” for “person” and “respondent’s” for “person’s” throughout, deleted “or unconditional” preceding “release of the committed” and “a sexually violent predator” preceding “in need of secure” and inserted the present second sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 662 in subsection A, inserted “and the attorney for the Commonwealth for the locality that is the proposed location of the respondent’s residence upon his conditional release” at the end of subsection A.

§ 37.2-912.
Conditional release; criteria; conditions; reports.

At any time the court considers the respondent’s need for secure inpatient treatment pursuant to this chapter, it shall place the respondent on conditional release if it finds that (i) he does not need secure inpatient treatment but needs outpatient treatment or monitoring to prevent his condition from deteriorating to a degree that he would need secure inpatient treatment; (ii) appropriate outpatient supervision and treatment are reasonably available; (iii) there is significant reason to believe that the respondent, if conditionally released, would comply with the conditions specified; and (iv) conditional release will not present an undue risk to public safety. In making its determination, the court may consider (i) the nature and circumstances of the sexually violent offense for which the respondent was charged or convicted, including the age and maturity of the victim; (ii) the results of any actuarial test, including the likelihood of recidivism; (iii) the results of any diagnostic tests previously administered to the respondent under this chapter; (iv) the respondent’s mental history, including treatments for mental illness or mental disorders, participation in and response to therapy or treatment, and any history of previous hospitalizations; (v) the respondent’s present mental condition; (vi) the respondent’s response to treatment while in secure inpatient treatment or on conditional release, including his disciplinary record and any infractions; (vii) the respondent’s living arrangements and potential employment if he were to be placed on conditional release; (viii) the availability of transportation and appropriate supervision to ensure participation by the respondent in necessary treatment; and (ix) any other factors that the court deems relevant. The court shall subject the respondent to the orders and conditions it deems will best meet his need for treatment and supervision and best serve the interests of justice and society. In all cases of conditional release, the court shall order the respondent to be subject to electronic monitoring of his location by means of a GPS (Global Positioning System) tracking device, or other similar device, at all times while he is on conditional release.The Department or, if the respondent is on parole or probation, the respondent’s parole or probation officer shall implement the court’s conditional release orders and shall submit written reports to the court on the respondent’s progress and adjustment in the community no less frequently than every six months. The Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services is authorized to contract with the Department of Corrections to provide services for the monitoring and supervision of sexually violent predators who are on conditional release.The Department or, if the respondent is on parole or probation, the respondent’s parole or probation officer shall send a copy of each written report submitted to the court and copies of all correspondence with the court pursuant to this section to the Attorney General and the Commissioner.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when any respondent is placed on conditional release under this article, the Department of Corrections and the Office of the Attorney General shall provide to the Department, or if the respondent is on parole or probation, the respondent’s parole or probation officer, all relevant criminal history information, medical and mental health records, presentence and postsentence reports and victim impact statements, and the mental health evaluations performed pursuant to this chapter, for use in the management and treatment of the respondent placed on conditional release. Any information or document provided pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject to disclosure under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.).

History.

1999, cc. 946, 985, § 37.1-70.13; 2001, c. 776; 2003, cc. 989, 1018; 2005, cc. 716, 914; 2006, cc. 698, 730, 863, 914; 2007, c. 876; 2009, cc. 740, 813, 840.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 914 amended former § 37.1-70.13, the former version of this section.
Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 amendment by c. 914 has been given effect in this section as set out above by adding subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 698 and 730, effective April 5, 2006, are identical, and in subsection A, added the last sentence in the first and second paragraphs.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 863 and 914 are nearly identical, and in subsection A, in the first paragraph, inserted the second sentence and added the last sentence.

The section is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 876 substituted “respondent” for “committed person” and made similar and related changes throughout; in subsection A, deleted “based on consideration of the factors that the court must consider in its commitment decision” preceding “he does not need” in item (i) of the first sentence and “conditionally released” following “The court shall subject,” in the third sentence and added the last sentence of the first paragraph; and, in subsection B, inserted “and the Office of the Attorney General,” deleted “of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” following “to the Department,” and substituted “this chapter” for “subsection B of §

37.2-904

and §

37.2-907

.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 740 deleted the last sentence of the first paragraph of subsection A, which read: “A continuance extending the review may be granted to either the Attorney General or the respondent upon good cause shown or by agreement of the parties.”

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” in the second paragraph of subsection A.